Maine, session 132, LD2068.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1952, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. Q, §25
and affected by Pt. X, §2, is further amended to read:
1. Carry flares Flares or bidirectional emergency reflective triangles. Except as
provided in subsection 1‑A, a truck or truck tractor with a registration for operation with
gross vehicle weight in excess of 10,000 pounds must be equipped with 2 red flags, 3 flares
and or 3 red lanterns or red emergency reflectors bidirectional emergency reflective
triangles.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1952, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
2. Disabled vehicle. When a truck or truck tractor with a registration for operation
with gross vehicle weight in excess of 10,000 pounds is disabled on a public way, the
operator shall, during the time that lights are required to be illuminated, place emergency
signals as follows:
A. One flare or lantern or red emergency reflector bidirectional emergency reflective
triangle in the center of the lane of traffic occupied by the disabled motor vehicle not
less than 100 feet from the vehicle in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane;
B. One flare or lantern or red emergency reflector bidirectional emergency reflective
triangle not less than 100 feet from the vehicle in the center of the same lane in the
opposite direction; and
C. One flare or lantern or red emergency reflector bidirectional emergency reflective
triangle at the traffic side of the vehicle not closer than 10 feet from the front or rear.
When lights are not required to be illuminated, red flags must be used, except that no flag
is required to be placed at the side of the vehicle.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1952, as amended by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. Q, §§25 and 26 and
affected by Pt. X, §2, is further amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2629(03)

As used in this section, "bidirectional emergency reflective triangle" means an
emergency warning device that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, 49 Code
of Federal Regulations, Section 571.125.
Page 2 - 132LR2629(03)